kumaoni.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>          ! Morpheme Border
%<v%>       ! Verb Stem

%<p1%>      ! First Person
%<p2%>      ! Second Person
%<p3%>      ! Third Person

%<sg%>      ! Singular
%<pl%>      ! Plural

%<m%>       ! Masculine
%<f%>       ! Feminine

LEXICON Root

Verb;

LEXICON v
%<p1%>%<sg%>%<f%> : %>मोए  #;
%<p1%>%<sg%>%<m%> : %>मोए   #;
%<p1%>%<pl%>%<f%> : %>मोए   #;
%<p1%>%<pl%>%<m%> : %>मोए   #;

%<p2%>%<sg%>%<f%> : %>मछा  #;
%<p2%>%<sg%>%<m%> : %>मछा  #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<f%> : %>मछा  #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<m%> : %>मछा  #;

%<p3%>%<sg%>%<f%> : %>मैं  #;
%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%> : %>मो  #;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%<f%> : %>मईं  #;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%<m%> : %>मईं  #;
 

LEXICON Verb

जा : जा  v  ;    ! to go
खा  : खा   v;    ! to eat
रु  : रु   v;    ! to cry
पि  : पि   v;    ! to drink
